Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Development Credit Corporation Act

48-101-101. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Development Credit Corporation Act.”

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-1701, 48-3-101.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Coal cooperative marketing associations, title 59, ch. 13.

Law Reviews.

Shareholder Oppression in Close Corporations: The Unanswered Question on Perspective, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

The Tennessee Corporation Act and Close Corporations for Profit (James S. Covington, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 183.

48-101-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board of directors” means the board of directors of a corporation created under this part;

“Corporation” means a development credit corporation created under this part;

“Financial institution” means any banking corporation or institution, trust company, savings bank, cooperative bank, savings and loan association, insurance company, or related corporation, partnership, foundation, or other institution engaged primarily in lending or investing funds;

“Loan limit” means, for any member, the maximum amount permitted to be outstanding at one (1) time on loans made by such member to the corporation, as determined under this part; and

“Member” means any financial institution authorized to do business within this state which shall undertake to lend money to a corporation created under this part, upon its call, and in accordance with this part.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-1702, 48-3-102.

48-101-103. Persons entitled to incorporate — Certificate of incorporation.

Twenty-five (25) or more persons, a majority of whom shall be residents of this state, who may desire to form a development credit corporation under this part, for the purpose of promoting, developing, and advancing the prosperity and economic welfare of the state and, to that end, to exercise the powers and privileges hereinafter provided, may be incorporated by making, subscribing, acknowledging, and filing, in the manner hereinafter provided, in the office of the secretary of state and of the register of the county in which the corporation elects to have its principal office, a certificate setting forth:

The name of the corporation, which shall include the words “Development Credit Corporation of Tennessee”;

The location of the principal office of the corporation;

The purpose for which the corporation is founded, which shall include the following:

To assist, promote, encourage, and, through the cooperative efforts of the institutions and corporations which shall, from time to time, become members thereof, develop and advance the business prosperity and economic welfare of the state;

To encourage and assist in the location of new business and industry in the state and to rehabilitate existing business and industry; to stimulate and assist in the expansion of all kinds of business activity which will tend to promote the business development and maintain the economic stability of the state, provide maximum opportunities for employment, encourage thrift, and improve the standard of living of the citizens of the state;

To cooperate and act in conjunction with other organizations, public or private, the objects of which are the promotion and advancement of industrial, commercial, agricultural, and recreational developments in the state; and

To furnish money and credit to approved and deserving applicants for the promotion, development, and conduct of all kinds of business activity in the state, thereby establishing a source of credit not otherwise readily available therefor;

The total amount of authorized capital stock and the number of shares in which it is divided;

That all stock shall be common with a par value of ten dollars ($10.00) per share;

That shares shall be issued only upon receipt by the corporation of cash in amount of no less than the par value;

That the minimum capital stock shall be one hundred thousand (100,000) shares; and

That at least twenty percent (20%) of the capital stock shall be paid into the treasury of the corporation before it shall be authorized to transact any business other than such as relates to its organization;

Whether or not the corporation is to have perpetual existence, and if not, the time its existence is to cease;

That if such corporation fails to subscribe the minimum stock within two (2) years from the filing of the certificate, its existence shall terminate; and

Any other provision or provisions, not contrary to law, which the incorporators may choose to insert for further regulation of the conduct of the corporation, or any provision or provisions creating, dividing, limiting, and regulating the powers of the directors, officers, and stockholders.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 3: T.C.A. §§ 48-1703, 48-3-103.

48-101-104. Completion of corporate entity.

The forms and procedure for completing the corporate entity shall be as provided in §§ 48-11-302, 48-12-103 — 48-12-105 or §§ 48-51-302, 48-52-103 — 48-52-105, as appropriate. Filing and recording fees shall be as provided in § 48-11-303 or § 48-51-303, as appropriate. Before the certificate of incorporation shall become effective, it must be approved by the commissioner of commerce and insurance, and from the date the certificate of incorporation is filed in the office of the secretary of state, with such approval, the stock subscribers, their successors and assigns, shall become a body corporate.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1(17.06); impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-1704, 48-3-104.

48-101-105. Powers.

Subject to the limitations of this part and the certificate of incorporation, every corporation incorporated under this part has all the powers, privileges, and immunities of private corporations incorporated under the general laws of this state and, in addition, has the powers to:

Borrow money for any of the purposes of the corporation;

Issue therefor its bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured; and

Secure the same by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or other lien on its property, franchises, rights and privileges of every kind and nature or any part thereof or interest therein;

Lend money to, and to guarantee, endorse, or act as surety on the bonds, notes, contracts, or other obligations of, or otherwise assist financially any person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust, and to establish and regulate the terms and conditions with respect to any such loans or financial assistance and the charges for interest and service connected therewith; provided, that the corporation shall not approve any application for a loan unless and until the person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust applying for the loan shall show that such person or entity has applied for the loan through ordinary banking channels and that the loan has been refused by at least one (1) bank or other financial institution that would be qualified by statute to make such a loan, it not being the intention hereof to take from any banking organizations any such loans or commitments as may be desired by such organizations generally in the ordinary course of their business;

Purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to sell, convey, transfer, mortgage, lease, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, upon such terms and conditions as its board of directors may deem advisable, real and personal property, together with such rights and privileges as may be incidental and appurtenant thereto and the use thereof, including, but not restricted to, any real or personal property acquired by such corporation from time to time in the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations;

Acquire the goodwill, business, rights, real and personal property and other assets, or any part thereof, or interest therein, of such persons, firms, corporations, joint stock companies, and to assume, undertake, guarantee, or pay the obligations, debts, and liabilities of any such person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust;

Acquire improved or unimproved real estate for the purpose of constructing industrial plants or other business establishments thereon or for the purpose of disposing of such real estate to others for the construction of industrial plants or other business establishments; and

Acquire, construct, or reconstruct, alter, repair, maintain, operate, sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of industrial plants or business establishments;

Acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities and evidences of interest in, or indebtedness of, any person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust, and while the owner or holder thereof, to exercise all the rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon;

Mortgage, pledge, or otherwise encumber any property, right or thing of value, acquired pursuant to the powers contained in subdivision (3), (4) or (5) as security for the payment of any part of the purchase price thereof;

Cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities of the small business administration and the Small Business Investment Company Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq.), or any similar federal agencies or programs;

Cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities of the former Tennessee board for economic growth [repealed] and any similar governmental agencies, and to cooperate with and assist, and otherwise encourage, local organizations in the various communities in the state in the promotion, assistance and development of the business prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of the state, or of any part thereof; and

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this part.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 48-1705, 48-3-105; impl. am. Acts 1995, ch. 347, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee board for economic growth, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 105, §§ 2 and 3, effective April 27, 2009.

48-101-106. First meeting and organization.

The first meeting of the corporation shall be called by a notice signed by three (3) or more of the incorporators, stating the time, place, and purpose of the meeting, a copy of which notice shall be mailed, or delivered, to each incorporator at least five (5) days before the day appointed for the meeting. The first meeting may be held without such notice upon agreement in writing to that effect, signed by all the incorporators. There shall be recorded in the minutes of the meeting a copy of the notice or of such unanimous agreement of the incorporators.

At such first meeting, the incorporators shall organize by choice by ballot of a temporary clerk, by the adoption of bylaws, by the election by ballot of directors, and by action upon such other matters within the powers of the corporation as the incorporators may see fit. The temporary clerk shall be sworn and shall make and attest a record of the proceedings. Ten (10) of the incorporators shall be a quorum for the transaction of business.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 14; T.C.A., §§ 48-1706, 48-3-106.

48-101-107. Board of directors and officers.

The business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed and conducted by a board of directors, a president and treasurer, and such other officers and such agents as the corporation by its bylaws shall authorize.

The board of directors shall consist of such number, not less than fifteen (15) nor more than twenty-one (21), as shall be determined in the first instance by the incorporators and thereafter annually by the members and the stockholders of the corporation.

The board of directors may exercise all the powers of the corporation, except such as are conferred by law or by the bylaws of the corporation upon the stockholders or members, and shall choose and appoint all the agents and officers of the corporation and fill all vacancies, except vacancies in the office of director which shall be filled as hereinafter provided.

The board of directors shall be elected as hereinafter provided. The board of directors shall be elected in the first instance by the incorporators and thereafter at each annual meeting of the corporation, or, if no annual meeting shall be held in any year at the time fixed by the bylaws, at a special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting. At each annual meeting, or at each special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting, the members of the corporation shall elect two thirds (2/3) of the board of directors and the stockholders shall elect the remaining directors.

The directors shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the corporation or special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting after their election and until their successors are elected and qualified, unless sooner removed in accordance with the bylaws.

Any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the members shall be filled by the directors elected by the members, and any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the stockholders shall be filled by the directors elected by the stockholders.

Directors and officers shall not be responsible for losses unless the same shall have been occasioned by the willful misconduct of such directors and officers.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 48-1707, 48-3-107.

48-101-108. Right to purchase or transfer capital stock or obligations of corporation — Membership.

Notwithstanding any rule of common law or any provision of any general or special law or any provision in their respective charters, agreements of association, articles of organization, or trust indentures:

All domestic corporations organized for the purpose of carrying on business within this state, including, without implied limitation, any public utility companies and insurance and casualty companies and foreign corporations licensed to do business in the state, and all trusts, are hereby authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of any bonds, securities, or other evidences of indebtedness created by, or the shares of the capital stock of, the corporation, and while owners of the stock to exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon, all without the approval of any regulatory authority of the state;

All financial institutions are hereby authorized to become members of the corporation and to make loans to the corporation as provided herein;

A financial institution which does not become a member of the corporation shall not be permitted to acquire any shares of the capital stock of the corporation; and

Each financial institution which becomes a member of the corporation is hereby authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, any bonds, securities, or other evidences of indebtedness created by, or the shares of the capital stock of, the corporation and, while owners of the stock, to exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon, all without the approval of any regulatory authority of the state; provided, that the amount of the capital stock of the corporation which may be acquired by any member pursuant to the authority granted herein shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the loan limit of such member. The amount of capital stock of the corporation which any member is authorized to acquire pursuant to the authority granted herein is in addition to the amount of capital stock in corporations which such member may otherwise be authorized to acquire.

Counties and incorporated cities and towns are hereby authorized to purchase capital stock of development credit corporations organized under the laws of this state. Surplus funds may be used or the governing body may levy a tax for such purpose. No stock shall be purchased or tax levied for this purpose except upon an election to be first held for the qualified voters of such county, city, or town, and the assent of three fourths (¾) of the votes cast at the election. An election for this purpose shall be held by the county election commission when requested to do so by a resolution of the governing body of the county, city, or town and after publication of three (3) notices in a newspaper circulating in the county, city, or town, the last publication to be not less than twenty (20) days next preceding the day of the election.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 6; 1959, ch. 243, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-1708, 48-3-108.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey (A.E. Ryman, Jr.), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257.

48-101-109. No preemptive rights respecting unissued stock.

No stockholder shall be entitled as of right to purchase or subscribe for any unissued stock of the corporation, whether now or hereafter authorized, or whether of a class not existing or of a class hereafter created, or to purchase or subscribe for any bonds, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, or other obligations convertible into stock of the corporation.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 48-1709, 48-3-109.

48-101-110. Membership of financial institutions.

Any financial institution may request membership in the corporation by making application to the board of directors on such form and in such manner as the board of directors may require, and membership shall become effective upon acceptance of such application by the board.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 48-1710, 48-3-110.

48-101-111. Duration of membership — Withdrawal.

Membership in the corporation shall be for the duration of the corporation; provided, that upon written notice given to the corporation three (3) years in advance, a member may withdraw from membership in the corporation at the expiration date of such notice. A member shall not be obligated to make any loans to the corporation pursuant to calls made subsequent to the withdrawal of the member.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 48-1711, 48-3-111.

48-101-112. Powers of stockholders and members — Voting.

The stockholders and members of the corporation have the following powers of the corporation, to:

Determine the number of the elected directors as provided in § 48-101-107;

Make, amend, and repeal bylaws;

Amend the charter as provided in § 48-101-119; and

Exercise such other of the powers of the corporation as may be conferred on the stockholders and the members by the bylaws.

As to all matters requiring action by the stockholders and members of the corporation, the stockholders and the members shall vote separately thereon by classes and, except as otherwise herein provided, such matters shall require the affirmative vote of the majority of the votes to which the stockholders present or represented at the meeting shall be entitled, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes to which the members present or represented at the meeting shall be entitled. Each stockholder shall have one (1) vote, in person or by proxy, for each share of capital stock held by the stockholder and each member shall have one (1) vote, in person or by proxy, except that any member having a loan limit of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall have one (1) additional vote, in person or by proxy, for each additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) which such member is authorized to have outstanding on loans to the corporation at any one (1) time as determined under § 48-101-113.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 48-1712, 48-3-112.

48-101-113. Loans to the corporation.

Each member of the corporation shall make loans to the corporation as and when called upon by it to do so on such terms and other conditions as shall be approved from time to time by the board of directors, subject to the following conditions:

All loan limits shall be established at the thousand-dollar ($1,000) amount nearest to the amount computed in accordance with this section;

No loan to the corporation shall be made if immediately thereafter the total amount of the obligations of the corporation would exceed ten (10) times the amount then paid in on the outstanding capital stock of the corporation;

The total amount outstanding on loans to the corporation made by any member at any one time, when added to the amount of the investment in the capital stock of the corporation then held by such member, shall not exceed:

Twenty percent (20%) of the total amount then outstanding on loans to the corporation by all members, including in the total amount outstanding, amounts validly called for loan but not yet loaned;

The following limit, to be determined as of the time such member becomes a member on the basis of the audited balance sheet of such member at the close of its fiscal year immediately preceding its application for membership:

Two percent (2%) of the capital and surplus of commercial banks and trust companies;

One percent (1%) of the total outstanding loans made by a savings and loan association; provided, that any credit corporation created pursuant to this part may in its certificate of incorporation, or by appropriate amendment thereto, provide that the loan limit of a savings and loan association member shall be only one half of one percent (0.5%) of the total outstanding loans made by such savings and loan association member;

One percent (1%) of the capital and unassigned surplus of stock insurance companies, except fire insurance companies;

One percent (1%) of the unassigned surplus of mutual insurance companies, except fire insurance companies;

One tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the assets of fire insurance companies; and

Such limits as may be approved by the board of directors of the corporation for other financial institutions;

Subject to subdivision (3)(A), each call made by the corporation shall be prorated among the members of the corporation in substantially the same proportion that the adjusted loan limit of each member bears to the aggregate of the adjusted loan limits of all members. The adjusted loan limit of a member shall be the amount of such member's loan limit, reduced by the balance of outstanding loans made by such member to the corporation and the investment in capital stock of the corporation held by such member at the time of such call; and

All loans to the corporation by members shall be evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the corporation, which shall be freely transferable at all times, and which shall bear interest at a rate of not less than one quarter of one percent (0.25%) in excess of the rate of interest determined by the board of directors to be the prime rate prevailing at the date of issuance thereof on unsecured commercial loans.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.25; T.C.A., §§ 48-1713, 48-3-113.

48-101-114. Obligations of corporation are legal investments for members.

Notwithstanding any other law, general or special, the notes or other interest-bearing obligations of such corporation, issued in accordance with and by virtue of this part and the bylaws of such corporation, shall be legal investments for the banking, insurance, and surety organizations which become members of such corporation, up to but in no event exceeding the loan limits established herein.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 48-1714, 48-3-114.

48-101-115. Limit on total obligations.

At no time shall the total obligations of such corporation exceed ten (10) times the amount of its paid-in capital and surplus, not including therein the earned surplus.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 48-1715, 48-3-115.

48-101-116. Earned surplus.

The corporation shall set apart as an earned surplus all of its net earnings in each and every year until such earned surplus shall equal the total of the paid-in capital and paid-in surplus then outstanding. The earned surplus shall be held in a depository, invested in United States government bonds, or as provided in such corporation's bylaws, and shall be kept and used to meet losses and contingencies of such corporation and, whenever the amount of earned surplus shall become impaired, it shall be built up again to the required amount in the manner provided for its original accumulation.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 48-1716, 48-3-116.

48-101-117. Deposit of funds.

The corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any banking institution, unless such institution has been designated as a depository by a vote of a majority of the directors present at an authorized meeting of the board of directors, exclusive of any director who is an officer or director of the depository so designated.

The corporation shall not receive money on deposit.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 48-1717, 48-3-117.

48-101-118. Supervision over corporation — Reports.

The corporation shall be subject to the supervision of and be examined by the commissioner of commerce and insurance and shall make such report of its condition and furnish such other information from time to time as the commissioner shall require.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 48-1718, 48-3-118.

48-101-119. Amendment of charter.

The charter may be amended by the votes of the stockholders and members of the corporation, voting separately by classes, and such amendments shall require approval by the affirmative vote of two thirds (2/3) of the votes to which the stockholders shall be entitled and two thirds (2/3) of the votes to which the members shall be entitled; provided, that no amendment of the charter which is inconsistent with the general purposes expressed herein or which authorizes any additional class of capital stock to be issued or which increases the obligation of a member to make loans to the corporation, or makes any change in the principal amount, interest rate, maturity date, or in the security or credit position, of any outstanding loan of a member to the corporation, or affects a member's right to withdraw from membership of the corporation as provided in § 48-101-111, or affects a member's voting rights as provided in § 48-101-112, shall be made without the consent of each member affected by such amendment. Amendment of the charter shall be completed in the same manner as provided for the corporate entity in § 48-101-104.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 48-1719, 48-3-119.

48-101-120. State credit not pledged.

Under no circumstances is the credit of the state pledged herein.

Acts 1959, ch. 170, § 17; T.C.A., §§ 48-1720, 48-3-120.